Alabama, session 2026rs, SB23.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 17-13-3.1 is added to the Code of
Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§17-13-3.1
(a) In the event: (i) the boundaries of one or more
legislative or congressional districts to be used in the next
general election are changed or altered by either an act of
the Legislature or by order, judgment, or mandate from a state
or federal court which permits or requires the use of
legislative or congressional district boundaries, and (ii) the
change or alteration is made at a time too late to be
accommodated during the normal primary election schedule held
or to be held in accordance with this chapter, the state shall
hold a new special primary election for the affected districts
Page 2

hold a new special primary election for the affected districts
SB23 INTRODUCED
in accordance with this section, so long as the special
primary election can be completed by the last day of August. A
special primary election held pursuant to this section shall
be required for the affected districts regardless of whether a
regular primary election was held for all or part of the
affected districts under the previous boundary lines.
(b) No candidate shall be deemed the party nominee of a
political party for an affected office based solely on the
results of the regular primary election if a new special
primary election is required under subsection (a). Any
official certification of results of any regular primary
election for an affected office are void for purposes of
determining the party nominee once a new special primary
election is required under this section. However, a candidate
who was eligible and qualified for the regular primary
election for an affected legislative or congressional district
office shall remain eligible to appear on the ballot for the
new special primary election, subject to laws and party rules
not inconsistent with this chapter. The certification of a
nominee for an affected office shall be based solely on the
results of the new special primary election conducted under
this section and any runoff election.
(c) Within five calendar days of the occurrence of an
event described in subsection (a) which triggers a new special
primary election, the Governor shall issue a proclamation
calling for the new special primary election.
(d) To the extent Section 17-13-3(d) is consistent with
this section, the provisions of that subsection shall apply to
Page 3

this section, the provisions of that subsection shall apply to
SB23 INTRODUCED
the new special primary election under this section.
(e)(1) Nothing in this section prohibits a party from
choosing its candidates by any means allowed by law other than
by primary election.
(2) Nothing in this section shall alter the timing of
regular primary elections when no change in district
boundaries has occurred as described in subsection (a).
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter
the date scheduled for the general election.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 4